California, session 20252026, SB539.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17075.10 of the Education Code is amended to read:17075.10. (a) (1) For health and safety projects for school facilities that are determined by the department to pose an unacceptable risk of injury to occupants in the event of a seismic event, wildfire, flood, or other state of emergency proclaimed by the Governor, a school district shall demonstrate both of the following to the satisfaction of the board:(A) That due to unusual circumstances that are beyond the control of the school district, excessive costs need to be incurred in the construction of school facilities.(B) That the facilities are needed to ensure the health and safety of pupils if the health and safety of pupils is at risk, including to end the disruption to the delivery of educational services due to damage to, or destruction of, school facilities.(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), health and safety projects include projects to replace the most vulnerable school facilities that are identified as a Category 2 building, as defined in the report submitted pursuant to Section 17317.(b) (1) A school district is eligible for health and safety funding to replace, reconstruct, or construct new classrooms and related facilities if the school district demonstrates there is a threat to the health and safety of pupils. To determine the applicable grant amounts, the district shall prepare and submit to the department a cost-benefit analysis that compares the minimum cost to remain in the classroom or related facility and mitigate the health and safety problem with the current replacement cost.(2) The project qualifies for modernization funding if the minimum cost is less than 50 percent of the current replacement cost of the classroom or related facility.(3) The project qualifies for replacement facilities if the cost-benefit analysis prepared pursuant to paragraph (1) demonstrates that the cost to remain in the classroom or related facility and mitigate the problem is at least 50 percent of the replacement value.(c) Notwithstanding any other law, for For health and safety projects for school facilities under this section, a school district may employ design sequencing methods to allow for any project delivery method authorized under existing law to support concurrent coordination and approval by the State Department of Education, the State Architect, and the State Allocation Board for expedited permitting, approval, and construction processes, and those state agencies may use machine learning to automate nondiscretionary aspects of those processes. A school district may also use machine learning to prepare documents and materials required for the permitting process.(d) The department shall develop regulations to define eligible health and safety projects that meet the requirements of subdivisions (a) and (b) for purposes of project approval by the board.(e)For purposes of this section, “design sequencing” means a method of project delivery that enables the sequencing of design activities to permit each construction phase to commence when the design for that phase is complete, instead of requiring the design for the entire project to be completed before commencing construction.SEC. 2. Section 17254 is added to the Education Code, to read:17254. The department, the Division of the State Architect, the Office of Public School Construction, and the State Allocation Board shall do both of the following:(a) Beginning July 1, 2026, and every five years thereafter, engage the Government Operations Agency to collaboratively review the processes relating to school design and construction to identify short-term, intermediate, and long-term improvements that can be made to those processes. The process review shall include collaboratively soliciting qualitative feedback from local educational agencies and school construction experts.(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, on or before December 1, 2026, and every five years thereafter, submit a report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, that identifies process changes to streamline how local educational agencies receive the approval required for school construction, including the requirements of the Division of the State Architect, and secure state funding, including from the state bond funds made available pursuant to the Leroy F. Greene School Facilities Act of 1998 (Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10).(2) The report required on or before December 1, 2026, shall also address all of the following priorities:(A) Implementation of specific timeframes for the Division of the State Architect to review submitted proposals.(B) Development of an alternative project delivery method specific to the need to expedite school reconstruction and repair in the aftermath of an emergency.(C) Development of an alternate project delivery method that incorporates process changes identified in the most recent process review described in subdivision (a) and innovations in design, construction, and financial management, such as progressive design-build, design sequencing, or incremental plan review principles, as appropriate.(D) Development of legislative proposals needed to allow innovations in design, construction, and financial management to become legal pathways to facilitating school facilities construction.(E) Alternatives to current practices that unintentionally disadvantage local educational agencies, such as preferences given on a first-come-first-served basis.(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature determine the priorities to be addressed by reports required after December 1, 2026.(c) For purposes of this section, “design sequencing” means a method of project delivery that enables the sequencing of design activities to permit each construction phase to commence when the design for that phase is complete, instead of requiring the design for the entire project to be completed before commencing construction.